pt-BR: Tapenade ingredientes principais: Alcachofra; Pimenta chili; Berinjela; Alho/cebola; Vegetais mistos; Azeitona; Pimentão vermelho; Frutos do mar; Tomate; Outro
nl: Tapenade hoofdingrediënten: Artisjok; Chilipeper; Aubergine; Knoflook/ui; Gemengde groenten; Olijf; Rode peper; Zeevruchten; Tomaat; Overig
hr-HR: Glavni sastojci tapenade: Artičoka; Čili papričica; Patlidžan; Češnjak/luk; Miješano povrće; Maslina; Crvena paprika; Plodovi mora; Rajčica; Ostalo
da: Hovedingredienser i tapenade: Artiskok; Chilipeber; Aubergine; Hvidløg/løg; Blandede grøntsager; Oliven; Rød peber; Fisk og skaldyr; Tomat; Andet
ru: Основные ингредиенты тапенада: Артишок; Перец чили; Баклажан; Чеснок/лук; Овощная смесь; Оливки; Красный перец; Морепродукты; Томат; Другое
nb: Hovedingredienser i tapenade: Artisjokk; Chilipepper; Aubergine; Hvitløk/løk; Blandede grønnsaker; Oliven; Rød paprika; Sjømat; Tomat; Annet
pl: Główne składniki tapenady: Karczoch; Papryczka chili; Bakłażan; Czosnek / cebula; Mieszanka warzyw; Oliwki; Czerwona papryka; Owoce morza; Pomidor; Inne
fi: Tapenaden pääainesosat: Artisokka; Chili; Munakoiso; Valkosipuli/sipuli; Sekavihannekset; Oliivi; Punainen paprika; Merenelävät; Tomaatti; Muu
zh-TW: 橄欖醬主要成分: 朝鮮薊; 辣椒; 茄子; 大蒜/洋蔥; 綜合蔬菜; 橄欖; 紅椒; 海鮮; 番茄; 其他
hu: A tapenád fő összetevői: Articsóka; Chili paprika; Padlizsán; Fokhagyma / hagyma; Vegyes zöldségek; Olívabogyó; Pirospaprika; Tenger gyümölcsei; Paradicsom; Egyéb
sk-SK: Hlavné ingrediencie tapenády: Artičoka; Čili paprička; Baklažán; Cesnak/Cibuľa; Miešaná zelenina; Oliva; Červená paprika; Morské plody; Paradajka; Iné
de: Hauptzutaten der Tapenade: Artischocke; Chili; Aubergine; Knoblauch/Zwiebel; Gemüsemischung; Olive; Rote Paprika; Meeresfrüchte; Tomate; Sonstige
ro-RO: Ingrediente principale pentru tapenadă: Anghinare; Ardei iute; Vinete; Usturoi/Ceapă; Amestec de legume; Măsline; Ardei roșu; Fructe de mare; Roșii; Altele
es: Ingredientes principales de la tapenade: Alcachofa; Chile; Berenjena; Ajo/cebolla; Verduras mixtas; Aceituna; Pimiento rojo; Mariscos; Tomate; Otro
bg-BG: Основни съставки на тапенадата: Артишок; Люта чушка; Патладжан; Чесън/лук; Смесени зеленчуци; Маслина; Червена чушка; Морски дарове; Домат; Друго
ja: タプナードの主原料: アーティチョーク; チリペッパー; ナス; ニンニク/タマネギ; ミックスベジタブル; オリーブ; レッドペッパー; シーフード; トマト; その他
pt-PT: Ingredientes principais da tapenade: Alcachofra; Malagueta; Beringela; Alho/cebola; Mistura de legumes; Azeitona; Pimento vermelho; Frutos do mar; Tomate; Outro
en: Tapenade main ingredients: Artichoke; Chili Pepper; Eggplant; Garlic/Onion; Mixed Vegetables; Olive; Red Pepper; Seafood; Tomato; Other
tr: Tapenade ana malzemesi: Enginar; Acı biber; Patlıcan; Sarımsak/Soğan; Karışık sebze; Zeytin; Kırmızı biber; Deniz ürünleri; Domates; Diğer
el: Κύρια συστατικά της ταπενάδας: Αγκινάρα; Πιπεριά τσίλι; Μελιτζάνα; Σκόρδο/Κρεμμύδι; Ανάμεικτα λαχανικά; Ελιά; Κόκκινη πιπεριά; Θαλασσινά; Ντομάτα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Pagrindiniai tapenados ingredientai: Artišokai; Aitriosios paprikos; Baklažanai; Česnakai / svogūnai; Daržovių mišinys; Alyvuogės; Raudonosios paprikos; Jūros gėrybės; Pomidorai; Kita
zh-CN: 橄榄酱的主要成分: 洋蓟; 辣椒; 茄子; 大蒜/洋葱; 混合蔬菜; 橄榄; 红辣椒; 海鲜; 番茄; 其他
it: Ingredienti principali della tapenade: Carciofi; Peperoncino; Melanzane; Aglio/cipolla; Verdure miste; Olive; Peperone rosso; Frutti di mare; Pomodoro; Altro
th: ส่วนประกอบหลักของทาปาเนด: อาร์ติโชค; พริก; มะเขือม่วง; กระเทียม/หัวหอม; ผักรวม; มะกอก; พริกแดง; อาหารทะเล; มะเขือเทศ; อื่นๆ
sv: Tapenadens huvudingredienser: Kronärtskocka; Chilipeppar; Aubergine; Vitlök/lök; Blandade grönsaker; Oliv; Röd paprika; Skaldjur; Tomat; Annat
cs: Hlavní ingredience tapenády: Artyčok; Chilli paprička; Lilek; Česnek / cibule; Míchaná zelenina; Oliva; Červená paprika; Mořské plody; Rajče; Jiné
vi: Các thành phần chính của Tapenade: Actisô; Ớt; Cà tím; Tỏi/Hành tây; Rau củ hỗn hợp; Ô liu; Ớt chuông đỏ; Hải sản; Cà chua; Khác
fr: Ingrédients principaux de la tapenade: Artichaut; Piment; Aubergine; Ail/oignon; Mélange de légumes; Olive; Poivron rouge; Fruits de mer; Tomate; Autre
sl-SI: Glavne sestavine tapenade: Artičoka; Čili; Jajčevec; Česen/čebula; Mešana zelenjava; Oliva; Rdeča paprika; Morski sadeži; Paradižnik; Drugo
ko: 타페나드의 주요 재료: 아티초크; 칠리페퍼; 가지; 마늘/양파; 혼합 채소; 올리브; 레드페퍼; 해산물; 토마토; 기타